New Jersey, session 221, A1986.
Be It Enacted by the Senate and General Assembly of the State of New Jersey: 1.    a.  A warrant shall not issue for a defendants failure to pay fines and fees arising from a non-moving motor vehicle violation. b.    A warrant arising from a defendants failure to pay fines and fees arising from a non-moving motor vehicle violation issued prior to the effective date of P.L.     , c. (C.        ) (pending before the Legislature as this bill) shall be void. c.     For the purposes of this section, a non-moving motor vehicle violation means any violation of the motor vehicle laws of this State for which motor vehicle points are not assessed by the Chief Administrator of the New Jersey Motor Vehicle Commission pursuant to section 1 of P.L.1982, c.43 (C.39:5-30.5). 2.    This act shall take effect immediately.